repository/apertium_hn_LC.dix
<pardef n="/vaha__p">
<e><p><l>usa</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usa</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usane</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usane</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>use</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>use</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usako</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usako</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usase</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usase</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usake</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ke"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usake</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ke"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>usameM</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usameM_se</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM_se"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usameM</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usameM_se</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM_se"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usapara</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usapara</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>una</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>una</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>unhoMne</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>unhoMne</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ne"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>unheM</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e r="LR"><p><l>unheM</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>unako</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>unako</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>unase</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>unase</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:se"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>unake</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ke"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>unake</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ke"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>unameM</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>unameM_se</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM_se"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>unameM</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>unameM_se</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:meM_se"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>unapara</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>unapara</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:para"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>vaha</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>vaha</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<!-- <e><p><l>ve</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ve</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e> -->
<e><p><l>ve</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ve</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="parsarg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usakA</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usake</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usake</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usake</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<!-- added for sentences like (She will be helped by anyone.) -->
<e><p><l>usakI</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:kI"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usakI</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:kI"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usakI</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usakI</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usakI</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>usakI</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>unakA</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>unake</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>unake</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>unake</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kA"/><s n="fnum:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<!-- 
<e><p><l>unakI</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kI"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>unakI</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="parsarg:kI"/><s n="fnum:s"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
-->
<e><p><l>unakI</l><r>vaha<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:kI"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>

<e lm="vaha"><i></i><par n="/vaha__p"/></e>
